os.lexc
LEXICON Fem-Ô-Stem						!fix o-stem i-infix
%<nom%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{U%^O%}		#	;	!gebu~gebo
%<acc%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe

%<nom%>%<pl%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o			#	;	!gebo~gebono
%<dat%>%<pl%>:%{U%^O%}n	#	;	!geba~gebe
%<acc%>%<pl%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;	!geba~gebe

LEXICON Masc-n-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:o			# ;
%<nom%>%<sg%>:a			# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:on		# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:an		# ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}n		# ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:on		# ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}n		# ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:on		# ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:an		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:an		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:ono		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:uno		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:onu		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:un		# ;


LEXICON Neut-n-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:a			# ;
%<nom%>%<sg%>:e			# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:a			# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:e			# ;
!%<gen%>%<sg%>:on		# ;	!unattested
!%<gen%>%<sg%>:an		# ;	!unattested
%<dat%>%<sg%>:an		# ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:on		# ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:un		# ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:an		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:ono		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:u%{M%}		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:an		# ;

LEXICON Fem-n-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:a			# ;
%<nom%>%<sg%>:e			# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:un		# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:on		# ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:an		# ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:un		# ;	
%<gen%>%<sg%>:on		# ;	
%<dat%>%<sg%>:un		# ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:on		# ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:an		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:on		# ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:ono		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:uno		# ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:ano		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:un		# ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on		# ;

LEXICON Masc-A-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}s		#	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u		#	; !extremely rare case remnant, consider remoƀing
!%<instr%>:o             	#       ; ! ƀariant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:os         	#       ; ! consider changing to %{O%^A%}s to account for scribal ƀariation
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o            	#       ; 
%<dat%>%<pl%>:u%{M%}            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on	        #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:os         	#       ; ! consider changing to %{O%^A%}s to account for scribal ƀariation
%<instr%>%<pl%>:u               #       ;
!%<nom%>%<pl%>:a		#	; !extreme scribal ƀariant, thus not included in compilation
!%<acc%>%<pl%>:a		#	; !extreme scribal ƀariant, thus not included in compilation

LEXICON Neut-A-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}s            #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}             #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u               #       ; !extremely rare case remnant, consider remoƀing
!%<instr%>:o                    #       ; ! ƀariant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:%{NAPL%}        #       ; ! plural morpheme is either zero or u depending on syllable weight
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o                 #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:u%{M%}            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on                #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:%{NAPL%}        	#       ; ! ! plural morpheme is either zero or u depending on syllable weight

LEXICON Masc-Ja-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:ies            	#       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:eas               #       ;
!%<gen%>%<sg%>:es               #       ; !rare, thus not included in compilation
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ie             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ea                # 	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:iu               #       ; !extremely rare case remnant, consider removing
!%<instr%>:o                    #       ; ! variant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:ios                #       ; ! consider changing to %{O%^A%}s to account for scribal ƀariation
%<gen%>%<pl%>:io                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:eo                 #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:iun            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:ion                #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:ios                #       ; ! consider changing to %{O%^A%}s to account for scribal ƀariation

LEXICON Neut-Ja-Stem
Masc-Ja-Stem				;

LEXICON Masc-Wa-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<nom%>%<sg%>:o                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:wes               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:we                #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:wa                #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:o                 #       ;

LEXICON Neut-Wa-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:uwes               #       ; 
%<gen%>%<sg%>:owes               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:uwe                #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;

LEXICON Masc-I-Stem-Short
%<nom%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:es            	#       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:ies            	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:i             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:e                 # 	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ie             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ea                # 	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:iu               #      ; 
%<instr%>:i                    #        ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:ios               #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:io            	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:iun             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:ion             	#       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;

LEXICON Masc-I-Stem-Long
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:es            	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:e             	#       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:io                #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o            	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:in             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:iun             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:ion             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:un             	#       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:i        		#	;

LEXICON Fem-I-Stem-Short
%<nom%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:i                #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:i               #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;
!%<gen%>%<pl%>:iu                #       ; ! not attested
%<dat%>%<pl%>:ion               #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;


LEXICON Fem-I-Stem-Long
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:es                #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:ies                #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:i                #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:eas                #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:i               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:e               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:iu               #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;

%<nom%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:e                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:io                #       ; 
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o                #       ; 
%<gen%>%<pl%>:i                #       ; 
%<dat%>%<pl%>:iun               #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:io%{M%}               #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:un               #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on               #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:i                 #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:e                 #       ;

LEXICON Neut-I-Stem-Short
Masc-I-Stem-Short			;

LEXICON ND-Stem-Decline
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:es		#	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}		#	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:i			#	;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:0			#	;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o			#	;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:%{U%^O%}n		#	;

LEXICON Athem-Masc
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%^A%}s		#	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{%^N%}e		#	; ! man can also have a zero dative plural
%<dat%>%<sg%>:i			#	;
%<nom%>%<pl%>:0			#	;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:%{%^N%}o		#	; ! man can also have an extra n in gen & dat pl
%<dat%>%<pl%>:%{%^N%}%{U%^O%}n		#	;

LEXICON N-Stem
hosa%<noun%>%<fem%>%<n-stem%>:hos Fem-n-Stem 		; ! hosa* 1, ho-s-a*, as., sw. F. (n): nhd. „Hose“, Strumpf, Stiefel; ne. trousers (N. Pl.), stocking (N.), boot (N.) (1); W.: mnd. hôse, hâse, F., „Hose“, Bekleidung der Beine und Füße, Beinling, Strumpf
slengira%<noun%>%<fem%>%<n-stem%>:slengir Fem-n-Stem 		; ! slengira 5, sle-ng-ira, as., sw. F. (n): nhd. Schleuder; ne. catapult (N.); W.: mnd. slengere, F., Schleuder, Schleuderwerkzeug
gramo%<noun%>%<masc%>%<n-stem%>:gram Masc-n-Stem 		; ! gramo 9, gra-m-o, as., sw. M. (n): nhd. böser Feind, Teufel; ne. fiend (M.)
rênifano%<noun%>%<masc%>%<n-stem%>:rênifan Masc-n-Stem 		; ! rênifano 4, rê-ni-fan-o, as., sw. M. (n): nhd. Rainfarn; ne. tansy (N.); W.: mnd. reinƀano, reynƀano
ôga%<noun%>%<neut%>%<n-stem%>:ôg Neut-n-Stem 		; ! ôga* 17, ôg-a*, as., sw. N. (n): nhd. Auge; ne. eye (N.); W.: mnd. ôge, N., Auge
ôra%<noun%>%<neut%>%<n-stem%>:ôr Neut-n-Stem 		; ! ôra 7, ôr-a, as., sw. N. (n): nhd. Ohr; ne. ear (N.) (1); W.: mnd. ôre, N., Ohr
LEXICON A-Stem
gisîth%<noun%>%<masc%>%<a-stem%>:gisîth Masc-A-Stem ;
lentînmânuth%<noun%>%<masc%>%<a-stem%>:lentînmânuth Masc-A-Stem ;
gidêl%<noun%>%<neut%>%<a-stem%>:gidêl Neut-A-Stem ; ! gidêl* 1, gi-dê-l*, as., st. N. (a): nhd. Teil, Anteil; ne. part (N.)
lint%<noun%>%<neut%>%<a-stem%>:lint Neut-A-Stem ; ! lint* 1, as., st. N. (a): nhd. Schleiertuch, Sommerkleid, Gewand; ne. dress (N.), ƀeil (N.); W.: s. mnd. lint, Sb., Band (N.), Stoffstreifen als Einfassung für die Kleidung
heri%<noun%>%<masc%>%<ja-stem%>:her Masc-Ja-Stem 		; ! heri 11, her-i, as., st. M. (ja): nhd. Heer, Menge, Volk; ne. army (N.), crowd (N.), people (N.); W.: ƀgl. mnd. hêr, hêre, N., Heer
sakeri%<noun%>%<masc%>%<ja-stem%>:saker Masc-Ja-Stem 		; ! sakeri* 1, sakkeri, sak-k-eri*, as., st. M. (ja): nhd. Scheiterhaufe, Scheiterhaufen; ne. pyre (N.)
gimôdi%<noun%>%<neut%>%<ja-stem%>:gimôd Neut-Ja-Stem 		; ! gimôdi* 2, gi-mô-d-i*, as., st. N. (ja): nhd. Versöhnung, Befriedigung; ne. reconciliation (N.); W.: mnd. gemote, gemode, N., Gemüt
krûci%<noun%>%<neut%>%<ja-stem%>:krûc Neut-Ja-Stem 		; ! krûci* 18, krûzi, krû-c-i*, krûz-i*, as., st. N. (ja): nhd. Kreuz; ne. cross (N.); W.: mnd. krüze, kruse, krutze, cruese, krüz, N., Kreuz
hlêo%<noun%>%<masc%>%<wa-stem%>:hlê Masc-Wa-Stem 		; ! hlêo* 1, hlê-o*, as., st. M. (wa): nhd. Grab, Grabhügel, Hügel; ne. graƀe (N.)
skado%<noun%>%<masc%>%<wa-stem%>:skad Masc-Wa-Stem 		; ! skado* 2, skad-o*, as., st. M. (wa): nhd. Schatten (M.); ne. shadow (N.); W.: mnd. schade, M., N., Schatten, Dunkel
saro%<noun%>%<neut%>%<wa-stem%>:sar Neut-Wa-Stem 		; ! saro?***, as., st. N. (wa): nhd. Rüstung; ne. armour (N.)
wurmmelo%<noun%>%<neut%>%<wa-stem%>:wurmmel Neut-Wa-Stem 		; ! wurmmelo* 2, wur-m-mel-o*, as., st. N. (wa): nhd. Wurmmehl; ne. wormdust (N.)
LEXICON Ô-Stem
mênsprâka%<noun%>%<fem%>%<ô-stem%>:mênsprâk Fem-Ô-Stem 		; ! mênsprâka* 1, mê-n-s-prâ-k-a*, as., st. F. (ô): nhd. „Meinsprache“, Freƀelrede; ne. eƀil speech (N.)
hêthinussia%<noun%>%<fem%>%<jô-stem%>:hêthinuss%{I%} Fem-Ô-Stem 		; ! hêthinussia* 1, hêth-i-n-us-s-i-a*, hêth-i-n-us-s-i*, as., st. F. (jô) (î): nhd. Heidentum; ne. paganism (N.)
LEXICON I-Stem
fôt%<noun%>%<masc%>%<i-stem%>:fôt	Masc-I-Stem-Long 		; ! fôt* 19, as., st. M. (i): nhd. Fuß; ne. foot (N.); W.: mnd. ƀôt, M., Fuß
iudeoliudi%<noun%>%<masc%>%<i-stem%>:iudeoliud	Masc-I-Stem-Short 		; ! Judeoliudi* 1 und häufiger, Jude-o-liud-i*, as., st. M. (i) Pl.: nhd. „Judenleute“, Juden; ne. Jews (M. Pl.)
meginkraft%<noun%>%<masc%>%<i-stem%>:meginkraft	Masc-I-Stem-Long 		; ! meginkraft* 8, meg-in-kra-f-t*, as., st. M. (i), st. F. (i): nhd. Macht, Kraft, Herrlichkeit; ne. power (N.)
stafwurt%<noun%>%<fem%>%<i-stem%>:stafwurt	Fem-I-Stem-Long 		; ! stafwurt* 1, sta-f-wurt*, as., st. F. (i): nhd. Stabwurz; ne. diptam (N.); W.: mnd. stafwort, F., Stabwurz
unwunni%<noun%>%<fem%>%<i-stem%>:unwunn	Fem-I-Stem-Short 		; ! unwunni* 1, un-wun-n-i*, as., st. F. (i): nhd. „Unwonne“, wonneloser Ort; ne. unpleasant place (N.)
liudskepi%<noun%>%<neut%>%<i-stem%>:liudskep	Neut-I-Stem-Short 		; ! liudskepi* 4, liud-s-kep-i*, as., st. N. (i): nhd. Volk; ne. people (N.)
